dicts/he_IL-ooe/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  7948 Y 1
SFX  7948 0 ימינו/64993 .
SFX  9730 Y 1
SFX  9730 0 ימינו/64994 .
SFX  13663 Y 1
SFX  13663 ו ילכן/64992 .
SFX  11732 Y 1
SFX  11732 0 פי/64998 .
SFX  8037 Y 1
SFX  8037 0 גייך/64993 .
SFX  12325 Y 1
SFX  12325 0 ילותיך/64991 .
SFX  8780 Y 1
SFX  8780 0 ילותיך/64993 .
SFX  7687 Y 1
SFX  7687 ח ישן/64992 .
SFX  9638 Y 1
SFX  9638 ח ישן/64993 .
SFX  12252 Y 1
SFX  12252 0 בע/64991 .
SFX  6565 Y 1
SFX  6565 0 בע/64992 .
SFX  12833 Y 1
SFX  12833 0 ררות/64991 .
SFX  11188 Y 1
SFX  11188 ח ישן/64998 .
SFX  12004 Y 1
SFX  12004 0 צותיהן/64991 .
SFX  10835 Y 1
SFX  10835 0 צותיהן/64993 .
SFX  9074 Y 1
SFX  9074 0 קותיו/64991 .
SFX  6245 Y 1
SFX  6245 0 זייך/64991 .
SFX  7573 Y 1
SFX  7573 0 ציותיהן/64993 .
SFX  5282 Y 1
SFX  5282 0 קותיו/64993 .
SFX  5786 Y 1
SFX  5786 0 זייך/64993 .
SFX  5402 Y 1
SFX  5402 0 נוהו/64992 .
SFX  7657 Y 1
SFX  7657 0 יכנה/64992 .
SFX  10678 Y 1
SFX  10678 0 יבוכן/64992 .
SFX  12426 Y 1
SFX  12426 0 יכני/64991 .
SFX  9089 Y 1
SFX  9089 0 קיו/64991 .
SFX  13881 Y 1
SFX  13881 ד ורו/64992 .
SFX  11895 Y 1
SFX  11895 0 יכני/64992 .
SFX  9345 Y 1
SFX  9345 0 יכני/64993 .
SFX  8870 Y 1
SFX  8870 ד ורו/64993 .
SFX  7757 Y 1
SFX  7757 ך לט/64991 .
SFX  7463 Y 1
SFX  7463 0 קיו/64993 .
SFX  6328 Y 1
SFX  6328 ך לט/64992 .
SFX  13898 Y 1
SFX  13898 ן פי/64992 .
SFX  7574 Y 1
SFX  7574 0 ציותיהם/64993 .
SFX  12425 Y 1
SFX  12425 0 יכים/64991 .
SFX  6954 Y 1
SFX  6954 0 יסטיות/64991 .
SFX  13845 Y 1
SFX  13845 0 יכים/64992 .
SFX  9344 Y 1
SFX  9344 0 יכים/64994 .
SFX  7205 Y 1
SFX  7205 0 קום/64991 .
SFX  6479 Y 1
SFX  6479 0 ורינו/64993 .
SFX  10166 Y 1
SFX  10166 0 קום/64992 .
SFX  13496 Y 1
SFX  13496 0 קום/64994 .
SFX  8299 Y 1
SFX  8299 0 עני/64991 .
SFX  12800 Y 1
SFX  12800 0 וכם/64991 .
SFX  11882 Y 1
SFX  11882 0 עני/64992 .
SFX  10016 Y 1
SFX  10016 0 עני/64993 .
SFX  5234 Y 1
SFX  5234 0 דה/64991 .
SFX  5396 Y 1
SFX  5396 0 וכם/64992 .
SFX  5322 Y 1
SFX  5322 0 דה/64992 .
SFX  6715 Y 1
SFX  6715 0 וכם/64993 .
SFX  6975 Y 1
SFX  6975 0 דה/64993 .
SFX  13014 Y 1
SFX  13014 ט יך/64991 .
SFX  12398 Y 1
SFX  12398 0 גיך/64991 .
SFX  7639 Y 1
SFX  7639 ט יך/64992 .
SFX  8223 Y 1
SFX  8223 ר שות/64991 .
SFX  7542 Y 1
SFX  7542 ט יך/64993 .
SFX  10587 Y 1
SFX  10587 0 דה/64998 .
SFX  8036 Y 1
SFX  8036 0 גיך/64993 .
SFX  7050 Y 1
SFX  7050 0 דה/64999 .
SFX  12324 Y 1
SFX  12324 0 ילותיכם/64991 .
SFX  8779 Y 1
SFX  8779 0 ילותיכם/64993 .
SFX  7686 Y 1
SFX  7686 ח ישנו/64992 .
SFX  9637 Y 1
SFX  9637 ח ישנו/64993 .
SFX  6913 Y 1
SFX  6913 ד ודיי/64993 .
SFX  11187 Y 1
SFX  11187 ח ישנו/64998 .
SFX  12003 Y 1
SFX  12003 0 צותיו/64991 .
SFX  10834 Y 1
SFX  10834 0 צותיו/64993 .
SFX  9073 Y 1
SFX  9073 0 קותיי/64991 .
SFX  6244 Y 1
SFX  6244 0 זיך/64991 .
SFX  7572 Y 1
SFX  7572 0 ציותיו/64993 .
SFX  12566 Y 1
SFX  12566 0 יפיה/64991 .
SFX  5281 Y 1
SFX  5281 0 קותיי/64993 .
SFX  5785 Y 1
SFX  5785 0 זיך/64993 .
SFX  13934 Y 1
SFX  13934 0 יפיה/64992 .
SFX  5401 Y 1
SFX  5401 0 נוך/64992 .
SFX  13404 Y 1
SFX  13404 0 יפיה/64993 .
SFX  10137 Y 1
SFX  10137 0 יפיה/64994 .
SFX  7739 Y 1
SFX  7739 0 מטרי/64991 .
SFX  13593 Y 1
SFX  13593 0 ריני/64992 .
SFX  10405 Y 1
SFX  10405 0 מטרי/64993 .
SFX  13804 Y 1
SFX  13804 0 יביהו/64992 .
SFX  8120 Y 1
SFX  8120 0 ריני/64994 .
SFX  10734 Y 1
SFX  10734 0 יחוך/64992 .
SFX  10677 Y 1
SFX  10677 0 יביהו/64994 .
SFX  9088 Y 1
SFX  9088 0 קייך/64991 .
SFX  13880 Y 1
SFX  13880 ד ורי/64992 .
SFX  8869 Y 1
SFX  8869 ד ורי/64993 .
SFX  8761 Y 1
SFX  8761 0 ילה/64991 .
SFX  6399 Y 1
SFX  6399 י לי/64991 .
SFX  7462 Y 1
SFX  7462 0 קייך/64993 .
SFX  5963 Y 1
SFX  5963 0 שה/64991 .
SFX  13565 Y 1
SFX  13565 י לי/64992 .
SFX  5173 Y 1
SFX  5173 0 ילה/64992 .
SFX  5646 Y 1
SFX  5646 0 שה/64992 .
SFX  11941 Y 1
SFX  11941 י לי/64993 .
SFX  8683 Y 1
SFX  8683 0 ילה/64993 .
SFX  6974 Y 1
SFX  6974 0 שה/64993 .
SFX  10375 Y 1
SFX  10375 י לי/64994 .
SFX  6953 Y 1
SFX  6953 0 יסטית/64991 .
SFX  10191 Y 1
SFX  10191 י לי/64995 .
SFX  13269 Y 1
SFX  13269 ו זר/64991 .
SFX  11767 Y 1
SFX  11767 ו זר/64992 .
SFX  10394 Y 1
SFX  10394 0 שה/64998 .
SFX  9926 Y 1
SFX  9926 ר שלו/64992 .
SFX  9856 Y 1
SFX  9856 0 ילה/64999 .
SFX  7049 Y 1
SFX  7049 0 שה/64999 .
SFX  13594 Y 1
SFX  13594 0 ריהו/64992 .
SFX  10482 Y 1
SFX  10482 ר שלו/64995 .
SFX  8121 Y 1
SFX  8121 0 ריהו/64994 .
SFX  12799 Y 1
SFX  12799 0 וכן/64991 .
SFX  6068 Y 1
SFX  6068 0 לות/64991 .
SFX  5395 Y 1
SFX  5395 0 וכן/64992 .
SFX  6714 Y 1
SFX  6714 0 וכן/64993 .
SFX  13013 Y 1
SFX  13013 ט יכה/64991 .
SFX  13283 Y 1
SFX  13283 ה ונן/64991 .
SFX  7638 Y 1
SFX  7638 ט יכה/64992 .
SFX  9959 Y 1
SFX  9959 ט יכה/64993 .
SFX  8222 Y 1
SFX  8222 ר שים/64991 .
SFX  8146 Y 1
SFX  8146 ה ונן/64992 .
SFX  13662 Y 1
SFX  13662 ו ילם/64992 .
SFX  13596 Y 1
SFX  13596 ר שים/64992 .
SFX  6810 Y 1
SFX  6810 ה ונן/64993 .
SFX  9754 Y 1
SFX  9754 ר שים/64994 .
SFX  8971 Y 1
SFX  8971 0 איתנו/64993 .
SFX  8414 Y 1
SFX  8414 ו יתה/64992 .
SFX  7644 Y 1
SFX  7644 ו יתה/64993 .
SFX  6912 Y 1
SFX  6912 ד ודם/64993 .
SFX  12002 Y 1
SFX  12002 0 צותיי/64991 .
SFX  10833 Y 1
SFX  10833 0 צותיי/64993 .
SFX  9072 Y 1
SFX  9072 0 קותייך/64991 .
SFX  7571 Y 1
SFX  7571 0 ציותיי/64993 .
SFX  12565 Y 1
SFX  12565 0 יפינו/64991 .
SFX  11576 Y 1
SFX  11576 0 בתנו/64991 .
SFX  9222 Y 1
SFX  9222 0 נון/64991 .
SFX  5280 Y 1
SFX  5280 0 קותייך/64993 .
SFX  13933 Y 1
SFX  13933 0 יפינו/64992 .
SFX  8162 Y 1
SFX  8162 0 בתנו/64992 .
SFX  5400 Y 1
SFX  5400 0 נון/64992 .
SFX  13403 Y 1
SFX  13403 0 יפינו/64993 .
SFX  6292 Y 1
SFX  6292 0 בתנו/64993 .
SFX  10136 Y 1
SFX  10136 0 יפינו/64994 .
SFX  8374 Y 1
SFX  8374 0 אתה/64991 .
SFX  10220 Y 1
SFX  10220 0 אתה/64992 .
SFX  6112 Y 1
SFX  6112 0 יביות/64991 .
SFX  8614 Y 1
SFX  8614 0 אתה/64993 .
SFX  11751 Y 1
SFX  11751 ן נאן/64993 .
SFX  10733 Y 1
SFX  10733 0 יחום/64992 .
SFX  9087 Y 1
SFX  9087 0 קיך/64991 .
SFX  13707 Y 1
SFX  13707 0 ורנה/64992 .
SFX  12797 Y 1
SFX  12797 0 ותכם/64991 .
SFX  11606 Y 1
SFX  11606 0 ותכם/64992 .
SFX  11562 Y 1
SFX  11562 0 בו/64991 .
SFX  8298 Y 1
SFX  8298 0 עותיה/64991 .
SFX  7461 Y 1
SFX  7461 0 קיך/64993 .
SFX  13433 Y 1
SFX  13433 0 פרי/64991 .
SFX  9984 Y 1
SFX  9984 ל מדו/64992 .
SFX  8661 Y 1
SFX  8661 0 בו/64992 .
SFX  5190 Y 1
SFX  5190 0 ותכם/64993 .
SFX  13555 Y 1
SFX  13555 0 פרי/64992 .
SFX  8555 Y 1
SFX  8555 0 עותיה/64993 .
SFX  5233 Y 1
SFX  5233 0 בו/64993 .
SFX  12611 Y 1
SFX  12611 ח יע/64991 .
SFX  7890 Y 1
SFX  7890 0 פרי/64993 .
SFX  10751 Y 1
SFX  10751 0 ותכם/64996 .
SFX  10485 Y 1
SFX  10485 ל מדו/64995 .
SFX  10384 Y 1
SFX  10384 0 בו/64995 .
SFX  6672 Y 1
SFX  6672 ח יע/64992 .
SFX  10986 Y 1
SFX  10986 0 פרי/64995 .
SFX  9988 Y 1
SFX  9988 ח יע/64993 .
SFX  9894 Y 1
SFX  9894 0 ותכם/64998 .
SFX  13661 Y 1
SFX  13661 ו ילן/64992 .
SFX  9925 Y 1
SFX  9925 ר שלנו/64992 .
SFX  11319 Y 1
SFX  11319 ל מדו/64999 .
SFX  9005 Y 1
SFX  9005 0 בו/64999 .
SFX  10692 Y 1
SFX  10692 0 בנוה/64992 .
SFX  7995 Y 1
SFX  7995 0 מניי/64993 .
SFX  13585 Y 1
SFX  13585 0 כין/64992 .
SFX  13309 Y 1
SFX  13309 ן נפנו/64992 .
SFX  12798 Y 1
SFX  12798 0 ותך/64991 .
SFX  10481 Y 1
SFX  10481 ר שלנו/64998 .
SFX  12813 Y 1
SFX  12813 0 ויי/64991 .
SFX  11607 Y 1
SFX  11607 0 ותך/64992 .
SFX  9849 Y 1
SFX  9849 0 כין/64994 .
SFX  5191 Y 1
SFX  5191 0 ותך/64993 .
SFX  12518 Y 1
SFX  12518 0 ידתו/64991 .
SFX  11792 Y 1
SFX  11792 ב ום/64991 .
SFX  6748 Y 1
SFX  6748 0 ויי/64993 .
SFX  10850 Y 1
SFX  10850 0 ידתו/64992 .
SFX  7718 Y 1
SFX  7718 ב ום/64992 .
SFX  13442 Y 1
SFX  13442 0 ידתו/64993 .
SFX  10752 Y 1
SFX  10752 0 ותך/64996 .
SFX  13365 Y 1
SFX  13365 ב ום/64994 .
SFX  12030 Y 1
SFX  12030 0 יבים/64991 .
SFX  12000 Y 1
SFX  12000 0 צותיך/64991 .
SFX  13788 Y 1
SFX  13788 0 יבים/64992 .
SFX  9895 Y 1
SFX  9895 0 ותך/64998 .
SFX  10831 Y 1
SFX  10831 0 צותיך/64993 .
SFX  12733 Y 1
SFX  12733 0 אר/64991 .
SFX  10646 Y 1
SFX  10646 0 יבים/64994 .
SFX  9070 Y 1
SFX  9070 0 קותיכם/64991 .
SFX  5320 Y 1
SFX  5320 0 אר/64992 .
SFX  8285 Y 1
SFX  8285 0 עתה/64991 .
